Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-511
State Fire Marshal; rules and regulations.

The State Fire Marshal may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Act in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2009, LB198, § 11.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.